Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 6. RECORDS

SUBTITLE C. RECORDS PROVISIONS APPLYING TO MORE THAN ONE TYPE OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT

CHAPTER 204. MICROFILMING OF RECORDS

Sec. 204.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Microfilm" means roll microfilm, microfiche, and all other formats produced by any method of microphotography or other means of miniaturization on film.

(2) "Microfilming" means the methods, procedures, and processes used to produce roll microfilm, microfiche, or other microphotographic formats.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 204.002. AUTHORIZATION. Any local government record may be maintained on microfilm in addition to or instead of paper or other media, subject to the requirements of this chapter and rules adopted under it.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 204.003. MICROFILM PRODUCED UNDER PRIOR LAW. (a) All microfilm produced before June 1, 1990, under prior law is validated to the extent the microfilm was produced in the manner and according to the standards prescribed by prior law.

(b) In rules adopted under Section 204.004, the commission may establish procedures for the retrospective certification of uncertified or improperly certified microfilm produced before April 1, 1990, that otherwise meets the standards prescribed by prior law.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 204.004. STANDARDS AND PROCEDURES. (a) The commission shall adopt rules on or before April 1, 1990, establishing standards and procedures for the microfilming of local government records. The rules must be approved as required by Section 441.165, Government Code.

(b) The rules must prescribe:

(1) standards for film quality, resolution, density, definition, and chemical stability;

(2) tests and other methods of inspection required to establish that prescribed standards have been met;

(3) procedures for verifying that records have been filmed accurately;

(4) procedures for the certification of microfilmed records;

(5) standards for the use of editorial and technical targets on microfilm;

(6) standards for the production of use copies from and the storage of master microfilm negatives;

(7) procedures for the labeling and indexing of microfilmed records;

(8) procedures establishing the manner in which court case papers must be filmed;

(9) procedures for the expunction of criminal records on microfilm pursuant to court order;

(10) standards for computer-output microfilm; and

(11) standards for providing access by the members of the public to records on microfilm to which they are entitled under law.

(c) In rules adopted under this section, the commission may establish differing standards and procedures for the microfilming of:

(1) any permanent record;

(2) any record of a municipal, justice, county, or district court; or

(3) any record to which access is restricted under Chapter 552, Government Code, or other state law.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(90), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 204.005. RULES TO BE UPDATED. The director and librarian shall monitor standards relating to microfilming developed for use by federal agencies or adopted by national organizations that develop and set standards in the fields of information and records management in order to recommend to the commission any needed amendments to rules.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 204.006. INDEXING. An index to a microfilm record must show the same information that may be required by state law for an index to the same record if it is not microfilmed.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 204.007. DESTRUCTION OF ORIGINAL RECORDS. (a) The original of a record that has been microfilmed pursuant to this chapter and rules adopted under it may be destroyed before the expiration of its retention period on a records retention schedule issued by the commission.

(b) A list of the originals of microfilmed records destroyed shall be filed with the records management officer.

(c) The microfilm record must be retained until the expiration of the retention period for the original record.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 533 (H.B. 1962), Sec. 18, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 204.009. MICROFILM OF PERMANENT RECORDS TO BE SUPPLIED. (a) A local government or elected county officer, at the request of the director and librarian, shall supply to the commission a copy of the microfilm of any permanent record to which access is not restricted by law.

(b) The commission shall reimburse the local government or elected county officer for the cost of the copy. If the film duplication is performed by the local government or elected county officer, the cost must be the same as that paid by state agencies to the Texas State Library for a similar microfilm copy. If the film duplication is done by a commercial microfilming service under contract with the local government or elected county officer, the cost of the copy may not exceed the cost paid by the local government or elected county officer for a copy under the contract.

(c) The director and librarian or an employee of the commission may not provide certified copies of a record on microfilm obtained under this section without the consent of the original local custodian of the record.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 204.010. COMMERCIAL MICROFILM STORAGE FACILITIES. (a) The commission may establish a program for the certification of commercial microfilm storage facilities for the storage of the master microfilm negatives of local government records.

(b) If the commission establishes a certification program, the procedures of this subsection apply. On request by the commercial storage facility, the director and librarian or the representative of the director and librarian shall inspect the facility to determine if the facility meets the minimum standards established by the commission under Section 204.004 for the storage of the microfilm of local government records. If the commercial storage facility meets the minimum standards established by the commission, the name of the facility shall be added to a list of certified storage facilities to be prepared by the director and librarian and made available on request to a local government, elected county officer, or other interested party. The inspection and certification of commercial storage facilities shall be on a fee basis to be determined by the commission.

(c) The commission shall determine the period a certification made under this section is effective.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 204.011. EFFECTIVE AS ORIGINAL RECORD. (a) A microfilmed record created in compliance with this chapter and rules adopted under it, including microfilm validated by Section 204.003, is an original record and shall be accepted by any court or administrative agency of this state.

(b) If issued and certified by a local government recordkeeper, a copy on paper or film of a microfilmed record shall be accepted by a court or administrative agency of this state as a certified copy of an original record.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 1248, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.